New Jersey, session 221, A302.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.2C:33-9 is amended to reads as follows: 2C:33-9.  Desecration of Venerated Objects. A person commits a disorderly persons offense if he purposely desecrates any  public monument, insignia, symbol, or structure, or place of worship or burial. A person commits a crime of the third degree if he purposely desecrates a military monument. "Desecrate"  means defacing, damaging or polluting. "Military monument" means any monument that was erected with the intent to honor a current or former member or members of the armed forces or to mark or commemorate a past military action or battle. (cf: N.J.S.2C:33-9) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.